Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3322
Veterinary medicine and surgery; license; application; qualifications.

Each applicant for a license to practice veterinary medicine and surgery in this state shall present to the department:

(1) Proof that the applicant is a graduate of an accredited school of veterinary medicine or holds a certificate issued by an entity that determines educational equivalence approved by the board indicating that the holder has demonstrated knowledge and skill equivalent to that possessed by a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine;

(2) Proof that the applicant has passed an examination approved by the board; and

(3) Such other information and proof as the department, with the recommendation of the board, may require by rule and regulation.

Laws 1967, c. 439, § 6, p. 1358;

Laws 1974, LB 811, § 15;

Laws 1975, LB 255, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 26;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 58;

Laws 2000, LB 833, § 8;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 35;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 55;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,158;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1104.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.